Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1526
Additional writ; goods unsold insufficient; further levy and sale.

When any writ shall issue, directing the sale of property previously taken in execution, the officer issuing said writ shall, at the request of the person entitled to the benefit thereof, his agent or attorney, add thereto a command to the officer to whom such writ shall be directed, that if the property remaining in his hands not sold shall, in his opinion, be insufficient to satisfy the judgment, he shall levy the same upon the lands and tenements, goods and chattels, or either, as the law shall permit, being the property of the judgment debtor, sufficient to satisfy the debt.

R.S.1867, Code § 491, p. 476;

R.S.1913, § 8067;

C.S.1922, § 9008;

C.S.1929, § 20-1526;

R.S.1943, § 25-1526.